Massachusetts, session 194th, H4650.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The first paragraph of section 131 of chapter 112 of the General Laws is
hereby amended by striking out the words “has passed an examination prepared by the board for
this purpose;”.
SECTION 2. The first sentence of the first paragraph of section 132 of chapter 112 of the
General Laws is hereby amended by striking out the words “Examinations for licensed certified
social workers, including those in independent clinical practice” and inserting in place thereof
the following words:- Examinations for licensed independent clinical social workers.
SECTION 3. Chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 135C the following section:-
Section 135D. To ensure a stable, diverse workforce of licensed social workers in the
commonwealth, and to provide for increased support and retention of practicing licensed social
workers, the commonwealth shall administer a paid practicum placement grant program for
Master of Social Work (MSW) students in good standing. The program shall, subject to
of 3

appropriation, provide grant funding to designated recipients with a specific focus on recruiting
and retaining MSW students from historically marginalized communities and low-income
communities. Funds to establish this program shall be allocated from state, federal, or other
dedicated resources, including existing trust funds.
Eligible applicants must attend a school of social work Masters program physically
located in Massachusetts that has been accredited by the Council on Social Work Education.
Applicant data, including application details submitted, shall be tracked by the executive
office so that the program efficacy and equity can be evaluated.
SECTION 4. Section 136 of chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the fourth paragraph the following paragraph:-
Licensed independent clinical social workers engaged in independent clinical practice
who provide one-on-one supervision to a licensed certified social worker, licensed social worker,
Masters of social work intern, or Bachelors of social work intern, shall be eligible to receive up
to 8 continuing education credits during a licensing period for this supervision.
SECTION 5. The executive office of health and human services shall conduct an
evaluation of the impact of removal of the licensing examination requirement for Licensed
Certified Social Workers under sections 1 and 2, should it deem such an evaluation necessary.
The evaluation may include an analysis of the impact of removing the examination requirement
on alleviating shortages of qualified social workers, expanding access to quality behavioral
health services, increasing the diversity of the social worker workforce among diverse language
skills, race, ethnicity, and cultural backgrounds, and the impact of any increase in diversity on
patient care, particularly for vulnerable populations. In preparing the evaluation, the consultant
of 3

shall meet with representatives of organizations representing social workers, social work
education, social work testing providers, social work patients, behavioral health advocacy
organizations, and other groups that may assist the evaluation. The evaluation and analysis shall
be conducted independently of the executive office. The executive office shall submit the
evaluation to the committee on higher education, the committee on mental health, substance use
and recovery and the house and senate committees on ways and means no later than the year in
which said evaluation was initiated.
SECTION 6. Sections 1 and 2 are hereby repealed.
SECTION 7. Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect on January 1, 2027. Section 6 shall take
effect on December 31, 2030.
of 3